Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-101
Act, how cited.

Sections 32-101 to 32-1552 shall be known and may be cited as the Election Act.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 337, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 514, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 964, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 8;

Laws 2001, LB 768, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1054, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 181, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 359, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 521, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 401, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB951, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB299, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB349, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB661, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB575, § 5;

Laws 2018, LB1065, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB492, § 35;

Laws 2020, LB1055, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB514, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 19;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 4.
April 16, 2026